District of Columbia statutes.
29-1301.06

Termination of status.

(a)

A benefit corporation may terminate its status as a benefit corporation and cease to be subject to this chapter by amending its articles of incorporation and deleting the provision required by § 29-1301.05. To be effective, the amendment must be adopted by at least the minimum status vote.

(b)

If a plan would have the effect of terminating the status of a business corporation as a benefit corporation, to be effective, the plan must be adopted by at least the minimum status vote. Any sale, lease, exchange, or other disposition of all or substantially all of the assets of a benefit corporation, unless the transaction is in the usual and regular course of business, shall not be effective unless the transaction is approved by at least the minimum status vote.

History

May 1, 2013, D.C. Law 19-305, § 2(b), 60 DCR 2735

Section References

This section is referenced in § 29-1301.02.